District of Columbia statutes.
1-614.02

Repealed

Content requirements.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1402, 25 DCR 5740
June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 101(q), 45 DCR 2464
1981 Ed., § 1-615.2.
1973 Ed., § 1-344.2.
Applicability of § 101(q) of D.C. Law 12-124: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-614.01.